Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2004.09
Combined Law Enforcement Information Network Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Combined Law Enforcement Information Network Cash Fund. The fund shall be maintained by the Nebraska State Patrol and administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety. The fund shall consist of fees collected by the Nebraska State Patrol from users of the network and shall be used to pay the costs of operating, maintaining, and enhancing the network. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2017, LB331, § 13.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.